Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8250
Trauma care regions; designated.

The department shall designate trauma care regions so that all parts of the state are within such a region.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 50;

Laws 2003, LB 467, § 2.